Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-111
Water safety education; grants; powers and duties.

The Game and Parks Commission shall create a program for the purpose of providing financial support for the education of persons about water safety in general and specifically for the education of children about staying away from water unless accompanied by an adult. The commission shall use the Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Cash Fund to award grants to nonprofit organizations that are dedicated to educating children about water safety. The grants shall be used by the recipient organization to support educating persons about water safety in general and specifically for the education of children about water safety.

Laws 2021, LB166, § 9.